Mississippi statutes. Title 69. Agriculture, Horticulture, and Animals
Article 3. Federal Aid Projects.

§ 69-27-101.
Mississippi State University of Agriculture and Applied Science to administer article.

In order to carry out the purposes of the Soil Conservation and Domestic Allotment Act enacted by the Congress of the United States, the Mississippi State University of Agriculture and Applied Science (hereinafter referred to as the “university”) is hereby designated as the agency of the State of Mississippi to administer any state plan authorized by this article which shall be approved by the secretary of agriculture of the United States (hereinafter referred to as the “secretary of agriculture”) for the State of Mississippi pursuant to the provisions of said Soil Conservation and Domestic Allotment Act.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4959; Laws, 1936, ch. 291.

§ 69-27-103.
Plan.

The university is hereby authorized, empowered and directed to formulate and submit to the Secretary of Agriculture, in conformity with the provisions of said Soil Conservation and Domestic Allotment Act, a state plan for each calendar year. It shall be the purpose of each such plan to promote such utilization of land and such farming practices as the university finds will tend, in conjunction with the operation of such other plans as may be approved for other states by the Secretary of Agriculture, to preserve and improve soil fertility, promote the economic use of land, diminish the exploitation and wasteful and unscientific use of natural soil resources, and reestablish and maintain the ratio between the purchasing power of the net income per person on farms and that of the income per person not on farms as defined in subsection (a) of Section 7 of said Soil Conservation and Domestic Allotment Act. Each such plan shall provide for adjustments in the utilization of land and in farming practices, through agreements with producers or through other voluntary methods, and for benefit payments in connection therewith, and also for such methods of administration not in conflict with any law of this state and such reports as the Secretary of Agriculture finds necessary for the effective administration of the plan and for ascertaining whether the plan is being carried out according to its terms.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4960; Laws, 1936, ch. 291.

§ 69-27-105.
Federal grants.

Upon the acceptance by the Secretary of Agriculture of each such plan submitted pursuant to Section 69-27-103, the university is authorized and empowered to accept and receive all grants of money made pursuant to said Soil Conservation and Domestic Allotment Act for the purpose of enabling the state to carry out the provisions of such plan, and all such funds, together with any moneys which may be appropriated by the state for such purpose, shall be available to the university for expenditures necessary in carrying out the plan, including administrative expenses, expenditures in connection with educational programs in aid of the plan, and benefit payments.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4961; Laws, 1936, ch. 291.

§ 69-27-107.
Powers of university.

In carrying out the provisions of each plan submitted pursuant to Section 69-27-103, and accepted by the Secretary of Agriculture, the university shall have power: to employ such agents or agencies, and to establish such agencies, as it may find to be necessary; to cooperate with local and state agencies and with agencies of other states and of the federal government; to conduct research and educational activities in connection with the formulation and operation of such plan; to enter into agreements with producers, and to provide by other voluntary methods, for adjustments in the utilization of land and in farming practices, and for payments in connection therewith in amounts which the university determines to be fair and reasonable.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4962; Laws, 1936, ch. 291.

§ 69-27-109.
Agents.

For the purpose of carrying out each such plan submitted pursuant to Section 69-27-103, and accepted by the Secretary of Agriculture, according to its terms, the university, through its board of trustees, is hereby authorized to delegate any of the powers herein conferred to such agents or agencies as may be designated by the university and approved by the Secretary of Agriculture.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4963; Laws, 1936, ch. 291.

§ 69-27-111.
Reports.

The university shall render for each year an annual report to the Governor, who shall transmit a copy thereof to each house of the Legislature, covering its administration of such plan, as referred to in this article, and all operations thereunder, including also the expenditure of funds, and each such report shall be printed as a public document promptly upon its transmittal to the Governor.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4964; Laws, 1936, ch. 291.

§ 69-27-113.
No liability on university.

Nothing herein shall be construed or operate to impose any obligation or liability upon the university or other than as herein specified.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4965; Laws, 1936, ch. 291.